Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1397.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1907-E(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1907-E. Mixed-use development tax credits.(a) Tax credit authority.--For purposes, and in accordance with the provisions of this article, the agency may allocate an amount not to exceed [$4,500,000] $15,000,000 in each fiscal year in mixed-use development tax credits and is directed to deposit proceeds and earnings derived from the sale into the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 fund.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1397PN1847 - 2 - 123